Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 1

General Provisions

4-5-101. Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.”

Acts 1974, ch. 725, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-507.

Cross-References. Applicability of chapter to health maintenance organizations, §56-32-118.

Power to make rules and regulations, §4-4-103.

Review of boards and commissions, title 27, ch. 9.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 2-12-1.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Administrative Law, § 3; 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 2, 8; 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 68; 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Service Commissions, § 3; 23 Tenn. Juris., Taxation, § 75.

Law Reviews.

Administrative Law — Ex Parte Contacts in Informal Rulemaking Under the Administrative Procedure Act, 52 Tenn. L. Rev. 67 (1984).

Bargaining Theory and Regulatory Reform: The Political Logic of Inefficient Regulation, 53 Vand. L. Rev. 599 (2000).

Bid Protests in Tennessee (Steven W. Feldman), 34 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 27 (1998).

Designing Administrative Law for Adaptive Management, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1 (2014).

Enlarging the Administrative Polity: Administrative Law and the Changing Definition of Pluralism, 1945-1970, 53 Vand. L. Rev. 1389 (2000).

Judicial Notice in Tennessee (Robert Banks, Jr. and Elizabeth T. Collins), 21 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 431 (1991).

States, Agencies, and Legitimacy, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 443 (2014).

Symposium -- Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

The Proper Scope of Nonlawyer Representation in State Administrative Proceedings: A State Specific Balancing Approach, 43 Vand. L. Rev. 245 (1990).

Unpacking the Force of Law, 66 Vand. L. Rev. 465 (2013).

4-5-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Administrative judge” means an agency member, agency employee or employee or official of the office of the secretary of state, licensed to practice law and authorized by law to conduct contested case proceedings pursuant to § 4-5-301;

“Agency” means each state board, commission, committee, department, officer, or any other unit of state government authorized or required by any statute or constitutional provision to make rules or to determine contested cases;

“Contested case” means a proceeding, including a declaratory proceeding, in which the legal rights, duties or privileges of a party are required by any statute or constitutional provision to be determined by an agency after an opportunity for a hearing. Such proceeding may include rate making; price fixing; granting of certificates of convenience and necessity; the making, review or equalization of tax assessments; the granting or denial of licenses, permits or franchises where the licensing board is not required to grant the licenses, permits or franchises upon the payment of a fee or the finding of certain clearly defined criteria; and suspensions of, revocations of, and refusals to renew licenses. An agency may commence a contested case at any time with respect to a matter within the agency's jurisdiction;

“Hearing officer” means an agency member, agency employee or employee or official of the office of the secretary of state, not licensed to practice law, and authorized by law to conduct a contested case proceeding pursuant to § 4-5-301;

“License” includes the whole or part of any agency, permit, certificate, approval, registration, charter or similar form of permission required by law;

“Licensing” includes the agency process respecting the grant, denial, renewal, revocation, suspension, withdrawal or amendment of a license;

“Order” means an agency action of particular applicability that determines the legal rights, duties, privileges, immunities or other legal interests of a specific person or persons;

“Party” means each person or agency named or admitted as a party, or properly seeking and entitled as of right to be admitted as a party;

“Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, association, governmental subdivision, or public or private organization of any character, including another agency;

“Policy” means any statement, document, or guideline prepared or issued by any agency pursuant to its delegated authority that merely defines or explains the meaning of a statute or a rule. “Policy” also means any statement, document, or guideline concerning only the internal management of state government that does not affect private rights, privileges, or procedures available to the public. For purposes of this subdivision (10), “internal management” means the administration of an agency's internal operations for the purpose of facilitating operational effectiveness and efficiency;

“Publication” means a posting of materials on the appropriate website by the secretary of state that have been submitted in accordance with this chapter or any other information for which the secretary of state is responsible;

“Rule” means any agency regulation, standard, statement, or document of general applicability that is not a policy as defined in subdivision (10) that:

Describes the procedure or practice requirements of an agency; or

Implements, prescribes, or interprets an enactment of the general assembly or congress or a regulation adopted by a federal agency. “Rule” includes the establishment of a fee and the amendment or repeal of a prior rule. “Rule” does not include:

Declaratory orders issued pursuant to § 4-5-223;

Intra-agency memoranda;

General policy statements that are substantially repetitious of existing law;

Agency statements that:

Relate to the use of the highways and are made known to the public by means of signs or signals; or

Relate to the curriculum of individual state-supported institutions of postsecondary education or to the admission or graduation of students of such individual institutions but not to the discipline or housing of students;

Rate filings pursuant to title 56, chapters 5 and 6; or

Statements concerning inmates of a correctional or detention facility, or statements concerning offenders who are serving a sentence under probation or parole in the community; and

“Small business” means a business entity, including its affiliates, that employs fifty (50) or fewer full-time employees.

Acts 1974, ch. 725, § 2; 1975, ch. 370, § 1; 1976, ch. 388, § 1; 1976, ch. 573, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-508; Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 1; 1984, ch. 728, §§ 9, 10; 1998, ch. 740, § 1; 2007, ch. 464, § 1; 2009, ch. 566, § 1; 2018, ch. 929, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 25 provided that the act shall apply to all rules and regulations filed with the secretary of state after July 1, 2009.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Administrative Law, § 3; 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 268; 6 Tenn. Juris., Colleges and Universities, § 10; 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, § 8; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 94.

Law Reviews.

How Many Bites Are Enough? The Supreme Court's Decision in University of Tennessee v. Elliott (Robert P. Morris), 55 Tenn. L. Rev. 205 (1988).

Attorney General Opinions. Memorandum of agreement between division of solid waste management and division of water pollution control not a rule subject to Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, OAG 95-084, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 94 (8/15/95).

Curriculum guidelines not rules subject to formal rulemaking procedures, OAG 99-010, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 4 (1/25/99).

It was not necessary for the zero tolerance policy and procedures memorandum of the department of human services regarding enforcement of child care statutes and regulations to be promulgated as a rule, OAG 00-079, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 82 (5/1/00).

The pharmacy based immunization program guidelines adopted by the Tennessee board of pharmacy are “rules” within the meaning of T.C.A. §4-5-102, OAG 01-091, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 82 (6/4/01).

The HUD regulations do not preempt the Administrative Procedures Act under any of the theories of implied preemption. OAG 10-105, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 111 (10/15/10).

4-5-103. Construction of chapter.

This chapter shall not be construed as in derogation of the common law, but as remedial legislation designed to clarify and bring uniformity to the procedure of state administrative agencies and judicial review of their determination and shall be applied accordingly.

Administrative agencies shall have no inherent or common law powers, and shall only exercise the powers conferred on them by statute or by the federal or state constitutions.

This chapter does not repeal § 65-2-110, and where there is a conflict between this chapter and that section, that section shall control. In any other case of conflict between this chapter and any statute, whether general or specific, this chapter shall control; however, compliance with the procedures prescribed by this chapter does not obviate the necessity of complying with procedures prescribed by other provisions of this code.

Nothing in this chapter shall be held to modify or repeal the statutes with respect to payment of taxes under protest and suits for the recovery thereof.

Acts 1974, ch. 725, § 19; 1975, ch. 370, § 15; 1978, ch. 938, §§ 14, 15; T.C.A., §§ 4-525, 4-5-119; Acts 1982, ch. 874, §§ 2, 25, 26; 2016, ch. 859, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, § 8.

Law Reviews.

Bid Protests in Tennessee (Steven W. Feldman), 34 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 27 (1998).

4-5-104. Suspension of provisions when necessary to avoid loss of federal funds.

The governor may exempt an agency from complying with any provision of this chapter where necessary to conform to any provisions of federal law or rules and regulations as a condition to the receipt of federal granted funds provided that:

The governor determines that, because of a conflict between this chapter and federal law or rules and regulations, receipt of federal funds either authorized, anticipated, or appropriated is placed in jeopardy;

The governor determines that the alternative procedure necessary to satisfy federal funding requirements does not abrogate basic fairness;

The governor exempts that agency from only those provisions of the chapter compliance with which would jeopardize federal funding;

The governor states in detail and in writing the governor's findings under subdivisions (a)(1) and (2), the extent of the agency's exemption under subdivision (a)(3), and the alternative procedures to replace those procedures from which the agency is exempted under this section;

The governor files a copy of such written statement with the secretary of state;

The effectiveness of the exemption shall in no case be extended beyond thirty (30) days after the date of adjournment of the next session of the general assembly lasting ten (10) legislative days or longer; and that if the general assembly fails to act within such legislative session to make by law such exemption permanent, then the governor may not at a later time reinstitute the same exemption; and

The governor may at any time determine that the federal funding is no longer jeopardized and at such time revoke the governor's exemption of an agency from any particular provision of the chapter, which revocation shall be effective upon the governor filing a written statement to that effect with the secretary of state.

Such administrative latitude is intended to facilitate the operation of state government and cooperation between the state of Tennessee and the United States government and shall not be used to create job positions that are intended to exist beyond the federal funding, nor to create any program requiring the expenditure of state funds not specifically directed by the general assembly, or that are intended to exist beyond the federal funding.

Acts 1974, ch. 725, § 4; 1975, ch. 370, § 10; 1978, ch. 895, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; Acts 1978, ch. 938, § 2; 1979, ch. 43, §§ 1, 2; 1979, ch. 200, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 4-510; modified; Acts 1980, ch. 550, § 1; 1980, ch. 758, § 1; 1981, ch. 42, §§ 1, 3; 1981, ch. 47, §§ 1, 4, 5; 1981, ch. 49, § 1; 1981, ch. 140, § 1; T.C.A., §4-5-123(d); Acts 1982, ch. 874, §§ 3, 15, 21, 25, 26.

4-5-105. Informal settlements.

Except to the extent precluded by another provision of law, informal settlement of matters that may make unnecessary more elaborate proceedings under this chapter is encouraged. Agencies may establish specific procedures for attempting and executing informal settlement of matters. This section does not require any party or other person to settle a matter pursuant to informal procedures.

Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 4.

Attorney General Opinions. Mediation by the Tennessee Human Rights Commission, OAG 94-115, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 118 (10/6/94).

4-5-106. Application.

This chapter shall not apply to the military, the governor, the general assembly, the state building commission, the state funding board or the courts, nor shall it apply to county and municipal boards, commissions, committees, departments or officers.

Disciplinary and job termination proceedings for inmates under the supervision of the department of correction or juveniles under the supervision of the department of children's services shall not be considered “contested cases” as defined by § 4-5-102.

Sections 4-5-105, 4-5-219, 4-5-223, 4-5-225 and 4-5-301 — 4-5-323 shall not apply to the board of claims, the state election commission or the board of parole.

The rulemaking and publication provisions of this chapter shall not apply to proclamations promulgated under title 70, and the promulgation, filing and publication provisions of such title shall control, except that the secretary of state shall publish on the administrative register website current and effective proclamations in the same manner that rules and other notices are published under § 4-5-220. The text of proclamations shall be published on the administrative register website under the proclamation section and shall have the same weight and effect prescribed in § 4-5-221(c), for the text of rules so published. The wildlife resources agency shall keep an original copy of all proclamations from which the effective dates of all proclamations can be determined.

Sections 4-5-303, 4-5-309, 4-5-311(a), (b) and (c), 4-5-312(c), 4-5-314(b), 4-5-315 — 4-5-318, 4-5-322 and 4-5-323, shall not apply to the department administering the Tennessee Employment Security Law, compiled in title 50, chapter 7.

This chapter shall not apply to revenue rulings and letter rulings issued by the commissioner of revenue.

Acts 1975, ch. 370, § 2; 1976, ch. 685, § 1; 1977, ch. 467, § 1; 1978, ch. 938, § 17; T.C.A., §§ 4-529, 4-5-123; Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 5; 1983, ch. 103, § 1; 1988, ch. 562, § 2; 1989, ch. 278, § 21; 1989, ch. 454, § 3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 16; 1998, ch. 1049, § 1; 1999, ch. 520, § 26; 2000, ch. 864, § 1; 2007, ch. 183, § 1; 2009, ch. 566, §§ 2, 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-5-106 (Acts 1974, ch. 725, § 6; 1975, ch. 370, § 13; T.C.A., § 4-512), concerning declaratory judgments on the validity of rules, was repealed by Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 35. For new law, see §4-5-225.

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 184 provided:

“Any provision of this act, or the application thereof, which is inconsistent with federal law, rule or regulation shall be deemed to be construed as being consistent with federal law, rule or regulation.”

Acts 1998, ch. 1049, which substituted “board of probation and parole” for “board of paroles” in (c), provided in § 68 that the act take effect May 18, 1998. Section 68 further provided that the implementation of the act take effect July 1, 1999; provided, that the act may be implemented before that date upon the request of the board through its chair, with the approval of the commissioner of personnel and the commissioner of finance and administration, with review and comment by the select oversight committee on correction.

Acts 2007, ch. 183, § 8 provided that § 1 of the act shall apply to claimants filing initial claims on or after July 2, 2007.

Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 25 provided that the act shall apply to all rules and regulations filed with the secretary of state after July 1, 2009.

Acts 2012, ch. 727, § 1 amended §4-3-104, which concerns name changes of departments and divisions, to provide that references to the board of probation and parole, formerly referred to in this section, are deemed references to the board of parole. This correction was made in subsection (c).

Cross-References. Commissioner of revenue, revenue and letter rulings, §67-1-109.

Powers of commissioner and department of revenue, §67-1-102.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

4-5-107. Majority needed to determine rules or contested cases — Exceptions.

Unless otherwise provided by statute, no state board, commission or department composed of two (2) or more members or commissioners shall make any rule or declaratory rulings or finally determine any contested case, as the terms “rule” and “contested case” are defined in this chapter, unless a majority of the members or commissioners is present.

Acts 1975, ch. 97, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 4-528, 4-5-122(a); Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-5-107 (Acts 1974, ch. 725, § 7; 1975, ch. 370, § 14; T.C.A., § 4-513), concerning declaratory ruling by agencies, was repealed by Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 34. For new law, see §4-5-223.

4-5-108. Legislative proposals affecting administrative procedure — Prior study.

Any legislation that, in whole or in part, amends or repeals any provision of this chapter, or any legislation that reestablishes, restructures or otherwise delegates any type of rulemaking authority to any new or preexisting governmental entity to which this chapter applies, shall be referred to the government operations committee according to the rules of the senate and the rules of the house of representatives. The government operations committees of each house shall then review the legislation and shall recommend that the legislation be considered for passage or shall recommend against passage to the appropriate standing committee.

Except when the government operations committee is designated as the appropriate standing committee, nothing contained in this section shall be construed to authorize the government operations committee to delay or prevent consideration of such legislation by the appropriate house by withholding its recommendation.

Nothing contained within this chapter shall be construed to prevent the government operations committee from being considered as an appropriate standing committee to consider legislation that amends or repeals any provision of this chapter.

Acts 1980, ch. 454, § 1; T.C.A., §4-5-131; Acts 1982, ch. 874, §§ 7, 42; 1983, ch. 479, § 1; 2009, ch. 566, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 25 provided that the act shall apply to all rules and regulations filed with the secretary of state after July 1, 2009.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of senate government operations committee, OAG 99-113, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 113 (5/14/99).